src/gulbot/announcements/assets/dictionary/uz_UZ_Cyrl.dic
агрошаҳар/AGVIJKLMQS
айрибурун/AGVIJKLMQS
ака-сингил/AGVIJKLMQS
бағир/AGVIJKLMQS
бақабурун/AGVIJKLMQS
бўғиз/AGVIJKLMQS
бўйин/AGVIJKLMQS
бурун/AGVIJKLMQS
итбурун/AGVIJKLMQS
ичак-қорин/AGVIJKLMQS
кажавақорин/AGVIJKLMQS
кўнгил/AGVIJKLMQS
қайнсингил/AGVIJKLMQS
қатқорин/AGVIJKLMQS
қорин/AGVIJKLMQS
қўйин/AGVIJKLMQS
қушбурун/AGVIJKLMQS
лўлақорин/AGVIJKLMQS
оғиз/AGVIJKLMQS
опа-сингил/AGVIJKLMQS
ота-ўғил/AGVIJKLMQS
пешбурун/AGVIJKLMQS
сингил/AGVIJKLMQS
туяқорин/AGVIJKLMQS
ўғил/AGVIJKLMQS
узунбурун/AGVIJKLMQS
ўрдакбурун/AGVIJKLMQS
ўрин/AGVIJKLMQS
шаҳар/AGVIJKLMQS
эгачи-сингил/AGVIJKLMQS
ярим/AGVIJKLMQS
